Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CAMPAIGN SPENDING LIMITS STUDY.new text end new text begin The Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board must study the voluntary campaign spending limits as provided in this section. By January 15, 2026, the board must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the board with its findings and recommendations. At a minimum, the board must study and report on: new text end new text begin (1) the number of candidates that participate in the public subsidy program, broken down by office; new text end new text begin (2) the number of candidates that do not participate in the public subsidy program, broken down by office; new text end new text begin (3) historic trend data for the past ten years for the information in clauses (1) and (2); new text end new text begin (4) for candidates that do not participate in the public subsidy program, how much the candidate and the candidate's opponent spends and how much is spent on independent expenditures in the race; new text end new text begin (5) how other states set voluntary campaign spending limits, including: new text end new text begin (i) if other states distinguish between highly contested races and other races in the amount of funding provided or spending allowed; new text end new text begin (ii) if other states have an automatic inflator on the subsidies and limits; and new text end new text begin (iii) the level of candidate participation over time in the programs; and new text end new text begin (6) any recommendations the board has regarding the current public subsidy program in Minnesota and whether the current spending limits are appropriate. new text end